District of Columbia statutes.
34-2401.20

Unlawful tapping of water pipe; penalty.

The unlawful tapping of any water pipe laid down in the District by authority of the United States is a misdemeanor and an indictable offense; and any person convicted of such offense in the criminal court of the District shall be subject to a fine not exceeding $500, or to imprisonment for a term not exceeding 1 year.

R.S., D.C., § 218
This section is referenced in § 34-2401.21.
1981 Ed., § 43-1546.
1973 Ed., § 43-1534.